California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(g) Any sanction collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the General Fund, and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used to improve the quality of skilled nursing facility services under the Medi-Cal program, and to fund the department’s administrative costs associated with implementing the program described in
 this section.

(h) (1) If a facility disputes any sanction made pursuant to this section, the facility shall, within 30 days of the facility’s receipt of the sanction assessment, submit a request for appeal to the department. The request shall include a detailed statement describing the reason for appeal and include all supporting documents the facility will present at the hearing.

(2) Within 30 days of the department’s receipt of the facility’s request for appeal, the department shall submit to the facility its responsive arguments and all supporting documents that the department will present at the hearing.

(3) The department shall hear a timely appeal and issue a decision as follows:

(A) The hearing shall commence within 60 days
 from the date of receipt by the department of the facility’s timely request for appeal.

(B) The department shall issue a decision within 120 days from the date of receipt by the department of the facility’s timely request for appeal.

(C) The decision of the department’s hearing officer, when issued, shall be the final decision of the department.

(4) The appeals process set forth in this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The provisions of Sections 100171 and 131071 of the Health and Safety Code do not apply to appeals under this subdivision.

(5) If a hearing decision issued pursuant to subparagraph (C) of
 paragraph (3) of this subdivision is in favor of the department, the skilled nursing facility shall pay the sanctions to the department within 30 days of the facility’s receipt of the decision. The sanctions collected shall be deposited in accordance with subdivision (g).

(i) Any sanction issued pursuant to this section shall not prohibit any state or federal enforcement action, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Public Health’s investigation process or issuance of deficiencies or citations under Chapter 2.4 (commencing with Section 1417) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) In implementing this section, the department may contract, as necessary, with California’s Medicare Quality Improvement Organization, or other entities deemed qualified by the department, not associated with a skilled nursing facility, to assist with development, collection,
 analysis, and reporting of the performance data pursuant to this section. The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for purposes of implementing this subdivision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Administrative Manual, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the State Department of General Services.

(k) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(l) For
 purposes of this section, “skilled nursing facility” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, excluding a nursing facility that is a distinct part of a facility that is licensed as a general acute care hospital as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 46, Sec. 10.   (AB 186)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.027.

Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the director may implement this article, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory
 action. The department shall make use of appropriate processes to ensure that affected stakeholders are informed of, and have access to, applicable guidance issued pursuant to this authority in a timely manner, and that this guidance remains
 publicly available while this article remains operative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 13, Sec. 12.   (AB 81)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.028.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) Section Q of the Minimum Data Set, Version 3.0, developed as part of the federal government’s nursing home quality initiative, uses a person-centered approach to ensure that all individuals have the opportunity to learn
 about home- and community-based services and have the opportunity to receive long-term care services in the least restrictive setting possible.

(2) More community care services and support options and choices are now available to meet the care preferences and needs in the least restrictive setting possible.

(b) Nursing facilities shall either meet the residents’ discharge planning and referral needs, or make referrals to a designated local contact agency (LCA) as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services. The LCA is responsible for contacting referred residents, and for providing information and counseling on available home- and community-based services. The LCA shall also either assist directly with transition services or make referrals to organizations that assist with transition services, as appropriate.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that nursing home residents who, during the Minimum Data Set, Version 3.0, Section Q assessment, express interest in the possibility of receiving care and services in the community are appropriately referred by nursing facilities to the LCA, as appropriate.

(d) The State Department of Health Care Services, in collaboration with the State Department of Public Health, shall, by April 1, 2013, provide the Legislature an analysis of the appropriate sections of the Minimum Data Set, Version 3.0, Section Q and nursing facilities referrals made to the LCA. This analysis shall also document the LCA’s response to referrals from nursing facilities and the outcomes of those referrals.

(e) The State Department of Public Health and the State Department of Health Care Services shall
 regularly, and at least quarterly, meet with representatives from the long-term care industry, organized labor, consumers, and consumer advocates to provide updates and receive input on the planning for, implementation of, and progress of the skilled nursing facility quality improvement program. To facilitate decisionmaking, the State Department of Public Health and the State Department of Health Care Services shall promptly convene this workgroup and provide ongoing guidance to reach tangible outcomes for implementation by no later than January 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 631, Sec. 7.   (AB 1489)   Effective September 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.029.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Long-term health care facility” means a skilled nursing facility or nursing facility as those terms are defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) and subdivision (k) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, respectively.

(2) “Timely” means within three calendar days of a long-term health care facility being served a hearing decision.

(b) A long-term health care facility shall timely comply with a hearing decision, as issued by the department’s Office of Administrative
 Hearings and Appeals pursuant to Section 1396r(e)(3) of Title 42 of the United States Code and Section 1599.1 of the Health and Safety Code, that finds that the long-term health care facility improperly transferred, discharged, or refused to readmit a resident.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and in addition to any other remedial action available to the department, if a long-term health care facility fails to timely comply with a hearing decision issued by the department’s Office of Administrative Hearings and Appeals, the department may assess penalties pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) Commencing on the fourth calendar day after the date of service of the hearing decision, the department may assess a penalty of seven hundred fifty dollars
 ($750) for each calendar day the facility fails to comply with the hearing decision.

(3) For each individual hearing decision, the department shall not assess aggregate penalties that exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

(d) To demonstrate compliance with a hearing decision, a long-term health care facility shall file a certification of compliance with the department within three calendar days of the date the hearing decision is served on that facility, in a form and manner as established by the department. The certification shall specify the date of service of the hearing decision and the date on which the resident was readmitted or the facility otherwise complied with the hearing decision. The department shall make a certificate of compliance available on its internet
 website.

(e) A long-term health care facility’s failure to timely comply with the hearing decision, including, but not limited to, a failure to file the certification of compliance within three calendar days of service of the hearing decision, as described in subdivision (d), shall subject that facility to the issuance of penalties as specified in subdivision (c), except as provided in subdivision (g).

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the amount of the assessed penalties, as calculated pursuant to subdivision (c), for a long-term health care facility may be deducted by the department from any Medi-Cal payments to that facility until the penalties are paid in full. If the department deducts the penalties from the Medi-Cal payments to the facility, the
 department shall provide prior written notice to the facility, and, in taking into account the financial condition of the facility, may apply that deduction over a period of time.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, if there is a merger, acquisition, or change of ownership involving a long-term health care facility that has outstanding penalties pursuant to this section, the successor long-term health care facility shall be responsible for paying to the department the full amount of outstanding penalties attributable to the facility for which it was assessed, upon the effective date of that transaction.

(g) The department may waive all or a portion of the penalties assessed under this section if a facility petitions for a waiver and the department determines, in its sole
 discretion, that the petitioning facility meets both of the following:

(1) The facility complied with the hearing decision or otherwise demonstrated to the department’s satisfaction that sufficient corrective action has been taken to remediate the underlying improper conduct.

(2) The facility demonstrated to the department’s satisfaction that imposing the full amount of penalties under this section has a high likelihood of creating an undue financial hardship for that facility or creates a significant difficulty in providing services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(h) Any penalties collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the General Fund, and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be
 used to improve quality of long-term care services under the Medi-Cal program, and to fund the department’s administrative costs associated with the hearings conducted pursuant to Section 1396r(e)(3) of Title 42 of the United States Code and Section 1599.1 of the Health and Safety Code for purposes of implementing this section.

(i) Any penalty the department assesses on a long-term health care facility pursuant to this section is appealable only to the superior court of the county where the facility is located.

(j) Any penalty issued pursuant to this section shall not prohibit any state or federal enforcement action, including, but not limited to, an enforcement action by the State Department of Public Health, for a violation of improper transfer or discharge or failure to readmit
 requirements.

(k) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of information notices, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(l) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(m) In the event that the long-term health care facility seeks judicial review of the
 hearing decision and the hearing decision is reversed through such review, the department, after being provided a copy of the final judicial order by the facility, shall refund to the facility any penalties paid by the facility associated with the reversed hearing decision.

(n) (1) A hearing decision for a hearing described in subdivision (b) shall be made by a hearing officer trained to consider and apply the procedural and substantive requirements of all applicable federal and state laws and regulations governing the transfer and discharge process.

(2) A hearing described in subdivision (b) shall afford the resident and facility due process, including, but not limited to, allowing the direct and cross-examination of witnesses under oath, allowing the
 presentation of documents as exhibits, and making a recording of all sessions of the proceedings of sufficient quality to allow for the preparation of a written transcript.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 384.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.031.

(a) In implementing this article, the department may use the process outlined in subdivision (c) of Section 14126.02 to obtain professional consulting services for the purpose of finalizing design of the system, procurement of required technical hardware and software, establishing operational parameters, implementation, and transitional management pending assumption of operational management by state
 staff.

(b) The ratesetting system described in subdivision (b) of Section 14126.02 shall be developed expeditiously in order to meet the implementation date required under Section 14126.02.

(c) To ensure compliance with the timeframes set forth in this article, it is the intent of the Legislature that the department be authorized to hire up to three full-time equivalents to support implementation and continuous operation of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 875, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.032.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall audit the costs and revenues of skilled nursing facilities that are associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency, as determined by the department, including, but not limited to, equivalent amounts paid pursuant to paragraph (15) of subdivision (c) of Section 14126.033, to determine whether a skilled nursing facility has adequately used increased Medicaid payments associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14124.12 for only allowable costs. For purposes of this section,
 allowable costs shall include patient care, additional labor costs attributable to the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency including, but not limited to, increased wages or benefits, shift incentive payments, staff retention bonuses, pay differential for workers employed by more than one facility, and overtime payments to nonmanagerial workers, and other appropriate costs that support the delivery of patient care, including, but not limited to, personal protective equipment, COVID-19 testing for any workers regardless of whether they are symptomatic or asymptomatic, infection control measures and equipment, and additional staff training. The department shall conduct financial audits of facility costs and revenues under this section based on the categories defined in Section 14126.023, including, but not limited to, direct labor costs, indirect labor costs, and administrative costs, and in accordance with any terms of federal approval obtained pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) For the costs and revenues associated with the time period of January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2023, the audit conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include an audit of revenues received by a facility that were spent on additional labor costs attributable to the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency, including, but not limited to, increased wages or benefits, shift incentive payments, staff retention bonuses, pay differential for workers employed by more than one facility, and overtime payments to nonmanagerial workers. If a skilled nursing facility spent less than 85 percent of revenues associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency on additional labor costs during this time period, the skilled nursing facility shall remit to the department the difference between that amount and 85 percent of revenues associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency received by that facility. If the skilled nursing facility fails to remit this
 amount within 90 days, the department shall recoup that amount by withholding the remittance amount from any Medi-Cal payment made to the facility, or by any other means available by law.

(3) Such increased wages or benefits, shift incentive payments, staff retention bonuses, pay differential for workers employed by more than one facility, overtime payments to nonmanagerial workers or other additional labor costs shall qualify for the purposes of paragraph (2) if they were either of the following:

(A) Implemented prior to January 1, 2023, and continued during the 2023 calendar year.

(B) Implemented on or after January 1, 2023.

(b) For purposes of implementing this section, a skilled nursing facility that received increased Medicaid payments described in subdivision (a) shall disclose, at the time and in the form and manner specified by the department, any information requested by the department relating to costs and revenues associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency. This may include, but is not limited to, documentation of any grant, loan, payment or other revenue received by the facility pursuant to any federal or state law related to the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency.

(c) To the extent permissible under federal law, and in addition to any other remedial actions available to the department, the department shall recoup any amounts of the increased Medicaid
 payments audited pursuant to
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) that were not used to support the delivery of patient care against any applicable Medicaid payments made to the facility.

(d) (1) The department shall seek any state plan amendments it deems necessary to audit the increased Medicaid payments described in subdivision (a) and recoup identified overpayments as described in this section.

(2) This section shall be implemented only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained, and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(e) For purposes of this section, “COVID-19 Public Health Emergency” means the federal Public Health Emergency declaration made pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code on January 30, 2020,
 entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus,” and any renewal of that declaration.

(f) For any recoupment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) or subdivision (c) associated with the audit of costs and revenues for the time period of January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2023, the amounts associated with such recoupment shall be added on a one-time basis to the amount available for the Workforce and Quality Incentive Program described in Section 14126.024 in a subsequent rate year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 46, Sec. 11.   (AB 186)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.    Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.033.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Costs within the Medi-Cal program continue to grow due to the rising cost of providing health care throughout the state and also due to increases in enrollment, which are more pronounced during difficult economic times.

(2) In order to minimize the need for drastically cutting enrollment standards or benefits during times of economic crisis, it is crucial to find areas within the program where reimbursement levels are higher than required under the standard provided in Section 1902(a)(30)(A) of the federal Social Security Act and can be reduced in accordance with federal law.

(3) The Medi-Cal program delivers its services and benefits to Medi-Cal beneficiaries through a wide variety of health care providers, under multiple delivery systems, including managed care, other contract models, or fee-for-service arrangements.

(4) The setting of rates within the Medi-Cal program is complex and is subject to close supervision by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(5) As the single state agency for the Medicaid program in California, the State Department of Health Care Services has unique expertise that can inform decisions that set or adjust reimbursement methodologies and levels consistent with the requirements of federal law.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature for the department to analyze and identify where reimbursement levels can be reduced
 consistent with the standard provided in Section 1902(a)(30)(A) of the federal Social Security Act and federal and state law and policies, including any exemptions contained in the act that added this section, provided that the reductions in reimbursement shall not exceed 10 percent on an aggregate basis for all providers, services, and products.

(c) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, this article shall be funded as follows:

(1) General Fund moneys appropriated for purposes of this article pursuant to Section 6 of the act adding this section shall be used for increasing rates, except as provided in Section 14126.031, for freestanding skilled nursing facilities, and shall be consistent with the approved methodology required to be submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to Article 7.6 (commencing with Section
 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding Section 14126.023, for the 2005–06 rate year, the maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal rate required for purposes of this article shall not exceed 8 percent of the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the 2004–05 rate year as adjusted for the change in the cost to the facility to comply with the nursing facility quality assurance fee for the 2005–06 rate year, as required under subdivision (b) of Section 1324.21 of the Health and Safety Code, plus the total projected Medi-Cal cost to the facility of complying with new state or federal mandates.

(B) Beginning with the 2006–07 rate year, the maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for purposes of this article shall not exceed 5 percent of the
 weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the prior fiscal year, as adjusted for the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.

(C) Beginning with the 2007–08 rate year and continuing through the 2008–09 rate year, the maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for purposes of this article shall not exceed 5.5 percent of the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the prior fiscal year, as adjusted for the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.

(D) For the 2009–10 rate year, the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for purposes of this article shall not be increased with respect to the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the 2008–09 rate year, as adjusted for the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.

(3) (A) For the 2010–11 rate year, if the increase in the federal medical assistance percentage (FMAP) pursuant to the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (ARRA) (Public Law 111-5) is extended for the entire 2010–11 rate year, the maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the purposes of this article shall not exceed 3.93 percent, or 3.14 percent, if the increase in the FMAP pursuant to ARRA is not extended for that period of time, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates. If the increase in the FMAP pursuant to ARRA is extended at a different rate, or for a different time period, the rate adjustment for facilities shall be adjusted accordingly.

(B) The weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted by the department for
 the following reasons:

(i) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve exemption changes to the facilities subject to the quality assurance fee.

(ii) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve any proposed modification to the methodology for calculation of the quality assurance fee.

(iii) To ensure that the state does not incur any additional General Fund expenses to pay for the 2010–11 weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase.

(C) If the maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal rate is reduced pursuant to subparagraph (B), the department shall recalculate and publish the final maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate.

(4) (A) Subject to the following provisions, for the 2011–12 rate year, the increase in the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the purpose of this article, for each skilled nursing facility as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not exceed 2.4 percent of the rate on file that was applicable on May 31, 2011, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates. The percentage increase shall be applied equally to each rate on file as of May 31, 2011.

(B) The weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted by the department for the following reasons:

(i) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve exemption changes to the facilities subject to the quality
 assurance fee.

(ii) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve any proposed modification to the methodology for calculation of the quality assurance fee.

(iii) To ensure that the state does not incur any additional General Fund expenses to pay for the 2011–12 weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase.

(C) The department may recalculate and publish the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase for the 2011–12 rate year if the difference in the projected quality assurance fee collections from the 2011–12 rate year, compared to the projected quality assurance fee collections for the 2010–11 rate year, would result in any additional General Fund expense to pay for the 2011–12 rate year weighted average reimbursement rate increase.

(5) To the extent that rates are projected to exceed the adjusted limits calculated pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (2) and, as applicable, paragraphs (3) and (4), the department shall adjust each skilled nursing facility’s projected rate for the applicable rate year by an equal percentage.

(6) (A) (i) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in subparagraph (B), payments resulting from the application of paragraphs (3) and (4), the provisions of paragraph (5), and all other applicable adjustments and limits as required by this section, shall be reduced by 10 percent for dates of service on and after June 1, 2011, through July 31, 2012. This one-time reduction shall be evenly distributed across all facilities to ensure long-term stability of nursing homes serving the Medi-Cal population.

(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, the director may adjust the percentage reductions specified in clause (i), as long as the resulting reductions, in the aggregate, total no more than 10 percent.

(iii) The adjustments authorized under this subparagraph shall be implemented only if the director determines that the payments resulting from the adjustments comply with paragraph (7).

(B) Payments to facilities owned or operated by the state shall be exempt from the payment reduction required by this paragraph.

(7) (A) Notwithstanding this section, the payment reductions and adjustments required by paragraph (6) shall be implemented only if the director determines that the payments that result from the application of paragraph (6) shall
 comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements and that federal financial participation will be available.

(B) In determining whether federal financial participation is available, the director shall determine whether the payments comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements, including those set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(C) To the extent that the director determines that the payments do not comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements or that federal financial participation is unavailable with respect to any payment that is reduced pursuant to this section, the director retains the discretion to not implement the particular payment reduction or adjustment and may adjust the payment as necessary to comply with federal Medicaid requirements.

(8) For
 managed care health plans that contract with the department pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), except for contracts with the Senior Care Action Network and AIDS Healthcare Foundation, and to the extent that these services are provided through any of those contracts, payments shall be reduced by the actuarial equivalent amount of the reduced provider reimbursements specified in paragraph (6) pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on July 1, 2011, or thereafter.

(9) (A) For the 2012–13 rate year, all of the following shall apply:

(i) The department shall determine the amounts of reduced payments for each skilled nursing facility, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, resulting from the 10-percent reduction imposed pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of
 paragraph (6) for the period beginning on June 1, 2011, through July 31, 2012.

(ii) For claims adjudicated through October 1, 2012, each skilled nursing facility as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code that is reimbursed under the Medi-Cal fee-for-service program, shall receive the total payments calculated by the department in clause (i), not later than December 31, 2012.

(iii) For managed care plans that contract with the department pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), except contracts with Senior Care Action Network and AIDS Healthcare Foundation, and to the extent that skilled nursing services are provided through any of those contracts, payments shall be adjusted by the actuarial equivalent amount of the reimbursements calculated in clause (i) pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on
 July 1, 2012, or thereafter.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), beginning on August 1, 2012, through July 31, 2013, the department shall pay the facility specific Medi-Cal reimbursement rate that was on file and applicable to the specific skilled nursing facility on August 1, 2011, prior to and excluding any rate reduction implemented pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) for the period beginning on June 1, 2011, to July 31, 2012, inclusive, and adjusted for the projected costs of complying with new state or federal mandates. These rates are deemed to be sufficient to meet operating expenses.

(C) The weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (B) shall be adjusted by the department if the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve any proposed modification to the methodology for calculation of
 the skilled nursing quality assurance fee pursuant to Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) Notwithstanding any other law, beginning on January 1, 2013, Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, which imposes a skilled nursing facility quality assurance fee, shall be unenforceable against any skilled nursing facility unless each skilled nursing facility is paid the rate provided for in subparagraphs (A) and (B). Any amount collected during the 2012–13 rate year by the department pursuant to Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall be refunded to each facility not later than February 1, 2013.

(E) The provisions of this paragraph shall also be included as part of a state plan amendment
 implementing the 2011–12 and 2012–13 Medi-Cal reimbursement rates authorized under this article.

(10) (A) Subject to the following provisions, for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 rate years, the annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the purpose of this article, for each skilled nursing facility as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be 3 percent for each rate year, respectively, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.

(B) (i) For the 2013–14 rate year, if there is a rate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate, the department shall set aside 1 percent of the increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate, from which the department shall transfer the nonfederal portion into the Skilled Nursing Facility
 Quality and Accountability Special Fund, to be used for the supplemental rate pool.

(ii) For the 2014–15 rate year, if there is a rate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate, the department shall set aside at least one-third of the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase, up to a maximum of 1 percent, from which the department shall transfer the nonfederal portion of this amount into the Skilled Nursing Facility Quality and Accountability Special Fund.

(C) The weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted by the department for the following reasons:

(i) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve exemption changes to the facilities subject to the quality assurance fee.

(ii) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve any proposed modification to the methodology for calculation of the quality assurance fee.

(11) The director shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. This section shall not be implemented until federal approval is obtained. When federal approval is obtained, the payments resulting from the application of paragraph (6) shall be implemented retroactively to June 1, 2011, or on any other date or dates as may be applicable.

(12) (A) (i) Beginning with the 2015–16 rate year, and through the conclusion of the rate period from August 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive, the annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate, required for the
 purposes of this article, shall be 3.62 percent, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.

(ii) The reimbursement rates established for the rate period of August 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive, shall be no less than the amounts that would have been established under the reimbursement methodology pursuant to this section for the 2019–20 rate year, subject to subparagraph (B).

(B) The weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.

(C) (i) Only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained for this subparagraph, the department may condition a
 facility’s receipt of the annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate pursuant to this paragraph for the rate period of August 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive, upon that facility’s good faith efforts to comply with any requirements related to the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency described in All Facility Letters issued by the State Department of Public Health. The department shall consult with the State Department of Public Health in determining a facility’s compliance for purposes of this subparagraph.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “COVID-19 Public Health Emergency” means the federal Public Health Emergency declaration made pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code on January 30, 2020, entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus,” and any renewal of that declaration.

(13) (A) For the 2021 calendar year, the annual aggregate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate that is required for the purposes of this article shall be 3.5 percent plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.

(B) The aggregate, weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.
